Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4333
Bonds; publication; when required.

The board of directors of a risk management pool may provide for the publication of any resolution or other proceeding adopted by it pursuant to the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act or, in lieu thereof, a notice of intention to issue bonds in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county where the principal office or place of business of the risk management pool is located or, if no newspaper is so published, then in a newspaper qualified to carry legal notices having general circulation in such county.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 33.